Louisiana, session 2026, HB645.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:176(G) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§176. Extracurricular activities; interscholastic athletics; participation; standards;
prohibitions; filming or videotaping; definitions
* * *
G. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no public school or
nonpublic school that receives state funds may be a member of, or participate in any
competition sponsored by, any intrastate interscholastic extracurricular athletic
association or organization that does not provide for the following persons to serve
as members of its governing board or committee and to be afforded the voting rights
prescribed for all members:
(1) A person appointed by the governor of Louisiana.
(2) A member of the House of Representatives appointed by the speaker of
the House of Representatives.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-458 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 645
(3) A member of the Senate appointed by the president of the Senate.